Louisiana, session 2026, HB339.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:11.2(C), (E)(1)(introductory paragraph), (H)(introductory
paragraph) and (3) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 44:11.2(A)(10) and
(11) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§11.2. Limited access to personal information for protected individuals
A. As used in this Section, the term "protected individual" shall mean:
* * *
(10) A current law enforcement officer.
(11) A current or retired administrative law judge.
* * *
C. As used in this Section, the term "publish" shall mean to publicly
post or publicly display on the internet personal information of a protected
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 339 ENROLLED
individual who submits a request pursuant to Subsection E of this Section
without any legitimate political, economic, or societal interest, or with the
intent to publicly intimidate or harass the protected individual.
* * *
E.(1) A protected individual, or the judicial administrator's office on
behalf of a protected individual identified in Paragraphs (A)(1) through (5) of
this Section or the Louisiana District Attorneys Association on behalf of a
protected individual identified in Paragraph (A)(6) of this Section, may request
that a public body or third party:
* * *
H. A protected individual, the judicial administrator's office, or the
Louisiana District Attorneys Association may bring an action for mandamus
due to a violation of this Section against a public body or third party for:
* * *
(3)(a) Reasonable attorney fees.
(b) For a third party, an action for a violation of this Section may also
be brought for damages incurred as a result of a violation of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 44:11.2(G) and (I) are hereby repealed.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.